Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.060

Assessment roll—Diagram on preliminary survey not conclusive.

The diagram or print directed to be submitted to the council shall be in the nature of a preliminary determination by the designated administrative board, officer, or authority upon the method and relative estimated amounts of assessments to be levied upon the property specially benefited by the improvement and shall not be binding or conclusive in any way upon the board, officer, or authority in the preparation of the assessment roll for the improvement or upon the council in any hearing affecting the assessment roll.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.060. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 11; RRS s 9362.]